Utah statutes.
78B-16-105.   Jurisdiction.

(1)  A petition under this chapter may be filed only in a court that has jurisdiction to make a child custody determination with respect to the child at issue under Title 78B, Chapter 13, Utah Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act.

(2)  A court of this state has temporary emergency jurisdiction under Section 78B-13-204 if the court finds a credible risk of abduction.

